Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-2004.10
Treasury Agency Forfeitures Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Treasury Agency Forfeitures Cash Fund. All forfeitures and proceeds received by the Nebraska State Patrol under the federal equitable sharing provisions distributed by federal Treasury agencies as of July 1, 2017, shall be deposited in the fund. This section shall not apply to funds otherwise subject to sections 28-431 and 28-1439.02. The fund shall be used only in accordance with the applicable requirements of the federal government. The fund shall be administered by the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2017, LB331, § 14.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.